Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 15-12-401. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

§ 15-12-402. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b).

§ 15-12-403. Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on the effective date of this chapter:

This chapter applies to a power of attorney created before, on or after the effective date of this chapter;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after the effective date of this chapter;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before the effective date of this chapter unless the court finds that application of a provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

An act done before the effective date of this chapter is not affected by this chapter.